Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2228
Nursing; use of title; restriction.

(1) In the interest of public safety and consumer awareness, it is unlawful for any person to use the title nurse in reference to himself or herself in any capacity, except individuals who are or have been licensed as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse. A Christian Science nurse may refer to himself or herself only as a Christian Science nurse.

(2) The terms "nurse", "registered nurse", and "licensed practical nurse" include persons licensed as registered nurses or licensed practical nurses by a state that is a party to the Nurse Licensure Compact. Unless the context otherwise indicates or unless doing so would be inconsistent with the compact, nurses practicing in this state under a license issued by a state that is a party to the compact have the same rights and obligations as imposed by the laws of this state on licensees licensed under the Nurse Practice Act. The department has the authority to determine whether a right or obligation imposed on licensees applies to nurses practicing in this state under a license issued by a state that is a party to the compact, unless that determination is inconsistent with the compact.

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 25;

Laws 2000, LB 523, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.17;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 784.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.